District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-5110

Choice of companies to provide required coverage.

Repealed.

History

Sept. 25, 1962, 76 Stat. 584, Pub. L. 87-686, § 10
Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-265, § 126(b), 48 DCR 1225
redesignated § 302, Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-213, § 20(b), 49 DCR 8140

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-1010.
1973 Ed., § 35-1610.